Tennessee statutes. Title 12 Public Property, Printing And Contracts
Part 2

Use of Alkaline Paper

12-7-201. Legislative findings and declarations.

The general assembly finds and declares that the use of alkaline paper for the publication of state records and documents of enduring value is a social and moral imperative to preserve our collective knowledge and heritage for the future. To this end, the general assembly declares it to be the public policy of this state to utilize alkaline paper in the printing and/or publication of permanent state records and documents whenever feasible.

Acts 1995, ch. 114, § 2.

Cross-References. School recycling program, §49-6-1020.

12-7-202. State records and documents to be printed on alkaline paper.

Each department, board, commission, agency or other entity of state government, including state institutions of higher education, shall use alkaline paper that meets or exceeds the American National Standards Institute standard for permanent paper for printed library materials (ANSI Z39.48), as approved by the commissioner of general services, for the printing or publication of all permanent state records or documents.

Acts 1995, ch. 114, § 3; 2008, ch. 1120, § 3.

12-7-203. Administration and enforcement — Approved list of alkaline papers.

The commissioner of general services is charged with the responsibility of administering and enforcing this part. The commissioner of general services shall provide to each department, board, commission, agency or other entity of state government an approved list of alkaline papers that meet or exceed the standard for permanent paper established in §12-7-202.

Acts 1995, ch. 114, § 4; 2008, ch. 1120, § 4.

12-7-204. County and municipal governments.

The general assembly further urges and encourages all county governments, municipal governments and other local governmental entities to utilize alkaline paper that meets the ANSI Z39.48 standard when such governments print and/or publish public records and documents of enduring value.

Acts 1995, ch. 114, § 7.

12-7-205. Rules and regulations.

The commissioner of general services is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of this part. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 1995, ch. 114, § 6; 2008, ch. 1120, § 5.

12-7-206. Construction with § 20-6-103.

Nothing in this part shall be construed to supersede §20-6-103. To the extent that this part is in conflict with §20-6-103, § 20-6-103 shall control.

Acts 1995, ch. 114, § 5.